District of Columbia statutes.
2-1521

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-227, § 2, 36 DCR 607
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 1-2621.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Special Education Student Funding Increase Non-service Nonprofit Provider Clarifying and Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-67, Apr. 5, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2624).
For temporary (90-day) establishment of a Children and Youth Initiative to provide out-of-school programs, see §§ 2402 to 2404 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 2404 of D.C. Law 13-38, see § 2(b) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Special Education Student Funding Increase Non-service Nonprofit Provider Clarifying and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-152, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10395).
Establishment of the D.C. Intragovernmental Youth Investment Collaborative, see Mayor’s Order 99-60, March 16, 1999 ( 46 DCR 2932).
Section 2402 of D.C. Law 13-38 provided: “There is established a Children and Youth Initiative (’Initiative’) to provide out-of-school programs for District of Columbia children and youth.”